Massachusetts, session 194th, H3216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
subsection:-
(jj) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by this chapter in an
amount equal to 50 per cent of the capital gain income from the sale of a residential property to a
first-time home buyer for use as their primary residence; provided, that the sale price of the
property is less than $750,000; provided further, that the residential property contains 4 or fewer
residential dwelling units; and provided further, that such credit shall not exceed $7,500 for a
single person, married person filing a separate return, head of household or married persons
filing jointly.
of 1